District of Columbia statutes.
38-731.02

Financial literacy education in schools.

The Mayor shall submit to the Council, within 180 days after August 15, 2008, a plan for the implementation of financial literacy education in public schools.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-209, § 3, 55 DCR 6979